Utah statutes.
78B-6-1506.   Procedure for approval of transfers.
(1)  An application under this part for approval of a transfer of structured
settlement payment rights shall be made by the transferee and may be brought
in the county in which the payee resides, in the county in which the
structured settlement obligor or the annuity issuer maintains its principal
place of business, or in any court which approved the structured settlement
agreement.
(2)  Not less than 20 days prior to the scheduled hearing on any application
for approval of a transfer of structured settlement payment rights under
Section 78B-6-1504, the transferee shall file with the court and serve on all
interested parties a notice of the proposed transfer and the application for
its authorization, including with the notice:
(a)  a copy of the transferee's application;
(b)  a copy of the transfer agreement;
(c)  a copy of the disclosure statement required under Section 78B-6-1503;
(d)  a listing of each of the payee's dependents, together with each
dependent's age;
(e)  notification that any interested party is entitled to support, oppose, or
otherwise respond to the transferee's application, either in person or by
counsel, by submitting written comments to the court or responsible
administrative authority or by participating in the hearing; and
(f)  notification of the time and place of the hearing and notification of the
manner in which and the time by which written responses to the application
must be filed, which shall be not less than 15 days after service of the
transferee's notice, in order to be considered by the court or responsible
administrative authority.
